tables/la-g1.utb
always \x0E9F\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 1246-1356-35
always \x0E9F\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 1246-1356-256
always \x0E9F\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 1246-1356-2356
always \x0E9F\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 1246-1356-236
always \x0EA1\x0ECD\x0EB2 134-1356
always \x0EA1\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 134-1356-35
always \x0EA1\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 134-1356-256
always \x0EA1\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 134-1356-2356
always \x0EA1\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 134-1356-236
always \x0EA2\x0ECD\x0EB2 6-13456-1356
always \x0EA2\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 6-13456-1356-35
always \x0EA2\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 6-13456-1356-256
always \x0EA2\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 6-13456-1356-2356
always \x0EA2\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 6-13456-1356-236
always \x0EA5\x0ECD\x0EB2 123-1356
always \x0EA5\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 123-1356-35
always \x0EA5\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 123-1356-256
always \x0EA5\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 123-1356-2356
always \x0EA5\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 123-1356-236
always \x0EA3\x0ECD\x0EB2 1235-1356
always \x0EA3\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 1235-1356-35
always \x0EA3\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 1235-1356-256
always \x0EA3\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 1235-1356-2356
always \x0EA3\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 1235-1356-236
always \x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EB2 2456-1356
always \x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 2456-1356-35
always \x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 2456-1356-256
always \x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 2456-1356-2356
always \x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 2456-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0ECD\x0EB2 125-1356
always \x0EAB\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 125-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 125-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 125-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 125-1356-236
always \x0EAD\x0ECD\x0EB2 135-1356
always \x0EAD\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 135-1356-35
always \x0EAD\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 135-1356-256
always \x0EAD\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 135-1356-2356
always \x0EAD\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 135-1356-236
always \x0EAE\x0ECD\x0EB2 123456-1356
always \x0EAE\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 123456-1356-35
always \x0EAE\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 123456-1356-256
always \x0EAE\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 123456-1356-2356
always \x0EAE\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 123456-1356-236
always \x0EDC\x0ECD\x0EB2 6-1345-1356
always \x0EDC\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 6-1345-1356-35
always \x0EDC\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 6-1345-1356-256
always \x0EDC\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 6-1345-1356-2356
always \x0EDC\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 6-1345-1356-236
always \x0EDD\x0ECD\x0EB2 6-134-1356
always \x0EDD\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 6-134-1356-35
always \x0EDD\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 6-134-1356-256
always \x0EDD\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 6-134-1356-2356
always \x0EDD\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 6-134-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECD\x0EB2 125-3-1356
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 125-3-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 125-3-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 125-3-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 125-3-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECD\x0EB2 125-12456-1356
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 125-12456-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 125-12456-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 125-12456-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 125-12456-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECD\x0EB2 125-13456-1356
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 125-13456-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 125-13456-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 125-13456-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 125-13456-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECD\x0EB2 125-1345-1356
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 125-1345-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 125-1345-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 125-1345-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 125-1345-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECD\x0EB2 125-123-1356
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 125-123-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 125-123-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 125-123-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 125-123-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EB2 125-2456-1356
always \x0EAB\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 125-2456-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 125-2456-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 125-2456-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 125-2456-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0EA1\x0ECD\x0EB2 125-134-1356
always \x0EAB\x0EA1\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 125-134-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0EA1\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 125-134-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0EA1\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 125-134-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0EA1\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 125-134-1356-236
always \x0E81\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EB2 1245-2456-1356
always \x0E81\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 1245-2456-1356-35
always \x0E81\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 1245-2456-1356-256
always \x0E81\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 1245-2456-1356-2356
always \x0E81\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 1245-2456-1356-236
always \x0E82\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EB2 13-2456-1356
always \x0E82\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 13-2456-1356-35
always \x0E82\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 13-2456-1356-256
always \x0E82\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 13-2456-1356-2356
always \x0E82\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 13-2456-1356-236
always \x0E84\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EB2 136-2456-1356
always \x0E84\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC8\x0EB2 136-2456-1356-35
always \x0E84\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0EC9\x0EB2 136-2456-1356-256
always \x0E84\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECA\x0EB2 136-2456-1356-2356
always \x0E84\x0EA7\x0ECD\x0ECB\x0EB2 136-2456-1356-236
# correct UM vowels
always \x0E81\x0EB3 1245-1356
always \x0E81\x0EC8\x0EB3 1245-1356-35
always \x0E81\x0EC9\x0EB3 1245-1356-256
always \x0E81\x0ECA\x0EB3 1245-1356-2356
always \x0E81\x0ECB\x0EB3 1245-1356-236
always \x0E82\x0EB3 13-1356
always \x0E82\x0EC8\x0EB3 13-1356-35
always \x0E82\x0EC9\x0EB3 13-1356-256
always \x0E82\x0ECA\x0EB3 13-1356-2356
always \x0E82\x0ECB\x0EB3 13-1356-236
always \x0E84\x0EB3 136-1356
always \x0E84\x0EC8\x0EB3 136-1356-35
always \x0E84\x0EC9\x0EB3 136-1356-256
always \x0E84\x0ECA\x0EB3 136-1356-2356
always \x0E84\x0ECB\x0EB3 136-1356-236
always \x0E87\x0EB3 12456-1356
always \x0E87\x0EC8\x0EB3 12456-1356-35
always \x0E87\x0EC9\x0EB3 12456-1356-256
always \x0E87\x0ECA\x0EB3 12456-1356-2356
always \x0E87\x0ECB\x0EB3 12456-1356-236
always \x0E88\x0EB3 245-1356
always \x0E88\x0EC8\x0EB3 245-1356-35
always \x0E88\x0EC9\x0EB3 245-1356-256
always \x0E88\x0ECA\x0EB3 245-1356-2356
always \x0E88\x0ECB\x0EB3 245-1356-236	
always \x0EAA\x0EB3 234-1356
always \x0EAA\x0EC8\x0EB3 234-1356-35
always \x0EAA\x0EC9\x0EB3 234-1356-256
always \x0EAA\x0ECA\x0EB3 234-1356-2356
always \x0EAA\x0ECB\x0EB3 234-1356-236
always \x0E8A\x0EB3 2346-1356
always \x0E8A\x0EC8\x0EB3 2346-1356-35
always \x0E8A\x0EC9\x0EB3 2346-1356-256
always \x0E8A\x0ECA\x0EB3 2346-1356-2356
always \x0E8A\x0ECB\x0EB3 2346-1356-236
always \x0E8D\x0EB3 13456-1356
always \x0E8D\x0EC8\x0EB3 13456-1356-35
always \x0E8D\x0EC9\x0EB3 13456-1356-256
always \x0E8D\x0ECA\x0EB3 13456-1356-2356
always \x0E8D\x0ECB\x0EB3 13456-1356-236
always \x0E94\x0EB3 145-1356
always \x0E94\x0EC8\x0EB3 145-1356-35
always \x0E94\x0EC9\x0EB3 145-1356-256
always \x0E94\x0ECA\x0EB3 145-1356-2356
always \x0E94\x0ECB\x0EB3 145-1356-236
always \x0E95\x0EB3 1256-1356
always \x0E95\x0EC8\x0EB3 1256-1356-35
always \x0E95\x0EC9\x0EB3 1256-1356-256
always \x0E95\x0ECA\x0EB3 1256-1356-2356
always \x0E95\x0ECB\x0EB3 1256-1356-236
always \x0E96\x0EB3 2345-1356
always \x0E96\x0EC8\x0EB3 2345-1356-35
always \x0E96\x0EC9\x0EB3 2345-1356-256
always \x0E96\x0ECA\x0EB3 2345-1356-2356
always \x0E96\x0ECB\x0EB3 2345-1356-236
always \x0E97\x0EB3 23456-1356
always \x0E97\x0EC8\x0EB3 23456-1356-35
always \x0E97\x0EC9\x0EB3 23456-1356-256
always \x0E97\x0ECA\x0EB3 23456-1356-2356
always \x0E97\x0ECB\x0EB3 23456-1356-236
always \x0E99\x0EB3 1345-1356
always \x0E99\x0EC8\x0EB3 1345-1356-35
always \x0E99\x0EC9\x0EB3 1345-1356-256
always \x0E99\x0ECA\x0EB3 1345-1356-2356
always \x0E99\x0ECB\x0EB3 1345-1356-236
always \x0E9A\x0EB3 1236-1356
always \x0E9A\x0EC8\x0EB3 1236-1356-35
always \x0E9A\x0EC9\x0EB3 1236-1356-256
always \x0E9A\x0ECA\x0EB3 1236-1356-2356
always \x0E9A\x0ECB\x0EB3 1236-1356-236
always \x0E9B\x0EB3 12346-1356
always \x0E9B\x0EC8\x0EB3 12346-1356-35
always \x0E9B\x0EC9\x0EB3 12346-1356-256
always \x0E9B\x0ECA\x0EB3 12346-1356-2356
always \x0E9B\x0ECB\x0EB3 12346-1356-236
always \x0E9C\x0EB3 1234-1356
always \x0E9C\x0EC8\x0EB3 1234-1356-35
always \x0E9C\x0EC9\x0EB3 1234-1356-256
always \x0E9C\x0ECA\x0EB3 1234-1356-2356
always \x0E9C\x0ECB\x0EB3 1234-1356-236
always \x0E9D\x0EB3 1346-1356
always \x0E9D\x0EC8\x0EB3 1346-1356-35
always \x0E9D\x0EC9\x0EB3 1346-1356-256
always \x0E9D\x0ECA\x0EB3 1346-1356-2356
always \x0E9D\x0ECB\x0EB3 1346-1356-236
always \x0E9E\x0EB3 1456-1356
always \x0E9E\x0EC8\x0EB3 1456-1356-35
always \x0E9E\x0EC9\x0EB3 1456-1356-256
always \x0E9E\x0ECA\x0EB3 1456-1356-2356
always \x0E9E\x0ECB\x0EB3 1456-1356-236
always \x0E9F\x0EB3 1246-1356
always \x0E9F\x0EC8\x0EB3 1246-1356-35
always \x0E9F\x0EC9\x0EB3 1246-1356-256
always \x0E9F\x0ECA\x0EB3 1246-1356-2356
always \x0E9F\x0ECB\x0EB3 1246-1356-236
always \x0EA1\x0EB3 134-1356
always \x0EA1\x0EC8\x0EB3 134-1356-35
always \x0EA1\x0EC9\x0EB3 134-1356-256
always \x0EA1\x0ECA\x0EB3 134-1356-2356
always \x0EA1\x0ECB\x0EB3 134-1356-236
always \x0EA2\x0EB3 6-13456-1356
always \x0EA2\x0EC8\x0EB3 6-13456-1356-35
always \x0EA2\x0EC9\x0EB3 6-13456-1356-256
always \x0EA2\x0ECA\x0EB3 6-13456-1356-2356
always \x0EA2\x0ECB\x0EB3 6-13456-1356-236
always \x0EA5\x0EB3 123-1356
always \x0EA5\x0EC8\x0EB3 123-1356-35
always \x0EA5\x0EC9\x0EB3 123-1356-256
always \x0EA5\x0ECA\x0EB3 123-1356-2356
always \x0EA5\x0ECB\x0EB3 123-1356-236
always \x0EA3\x0EB3 1235-1356
always \x0EA3\x0EC8\x0EB3 1235-1356-35
always \x0EA3\x0EC9\x0EB3 1235-1356-256
always \x0EA3\x0ECA\x0EB3 1235-1356-2356
always \x0EA3\x0ECB\x0EB3 1235-1356-236
always \x0EA7\x0EB3 2456-1356
always \x0EA7\x0EC8\x0EB3 2456-1356-35
always \x0EA7\x0EC9\x0EB3 2456-1356-256
always \x0EA7\x0ECA\x0EB3 2456-1356-2356
always \x0EA7\x0ECB\x0EB3 2456-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0EB3 125-1356
always \x0EAB\x0EC8\x0EB3 125-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0EC9\x0EB3 125-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0ECA\x0EB3 125-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0ECB\x0EB3 125-1356-236
always \x0EAD\x0EB3 135-1356
always \x0EAD\x0EC8\x0EB3 135-1356-35
always \x0EAD\x0EC9\x0EB3 135-1356-256
always \x0EAD\x0ECA\x0EB3 135-1356-2356
always \x0EAD\x0ECB\x0EB3 135-1356-236
always \x0EAE\x0EB3 123456-1356
always \x0EAE\x0EC8\x0EB3 123456-1356-35
always \x0EAE\x0EC9\x0EB3 123456-1356-256
always \x0EAE\x0ECA\x0EB3 123456-1356-2356
always \x0EAE\x0ECB\x0EB3 123456-1356-236
always \x0EDC\x0EB3 6-1345-1356
always \x0EDC\x0EC8\x0EB3 6-1345-1356-35
always \x0EDC\x0EC9\x0EB3 6-1345-1356-256
always \x0EDC\x0ECA\x0EB3 6-1345-1356-2356
always \x0EDC\x0ECB\x0EB3 6-1345-1356-236
always \x0EDD\x0EB3 6-134-1356
always \x0EDD\x0EC8\x0EB3 6-134-1356-35
always \x0EDD\x0EC9\x0EB3 6-134-1356-256
always \x0EDD\x0ECA\x0EB3 6-134-1356-2356
always \x0EDD\x0ECB\x0EB3 6-134-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EB3 125-3-1356
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EC8\x0EB3 125-3-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0EC9\x0EB3 125-3-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECA\x0EB3 125-3-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0EBC\x0ECB\x0EB3 125-3-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0EB3 125-12456-1356
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0EC8\x0EB3 125-12456-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0EC9\x0EB3 125-12456-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECA\x0EB3 125-12456-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0E87\x0ECB\x0EB3 125-12456-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EB3 125-13456-1356
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EC8\x0EB3 125-13456-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0EC9\x0EB3 125-13456-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECA\x0EB3 125-13456-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0E8D\x0ECB\x0EB3 125-13456-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0EB3 125-1345-1356
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0EC8\x0EB3 125-1345-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0EC9\x0EB3 125-1345-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECA\x0EB3 125-1345-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0E99\x0ECB\x0EB3 125-1345-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EB3 125-123-1356
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EC8\x0EB3 125-123-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0EC9\x0EB3 125-123-1356-256
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECA\x0EB3 125-123-1356-2356
always \x0EAB\x0EA5\x0ECB\x0EB3 125-123-1356-236
always \x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EB3 125-2456-1356
always \x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EC8\x0EB3 125-2456-1356-35
always \x0EAB\x0EA7\x0EC9\x0EB3 125-2456-1356-256
